Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska69-2602
Definitions, where found.

For purposes of the Assistive Technology Regulation Act, the definitions found in sections 69-2603 to 69-2613 apply.

Laws 1997, LB 802, § 2.